Missouri, session 2026, SB1065.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.2707, 71.340, 226.220, 227.558,
227.559, and 229.360, RSMo, are repealed and eight new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 67.1849,
67.2707, 71.340, 226.220, 226.224, 227.558, 227.559, and
229.360, to read as follows:
67.1849. 1. Notwithstanding any rule, order,
decision, permit, agreement, or other authorization to the
contrary, a county shall not perform any road project unless
it reimburses any non-rate-regulated utility provider, as
defined in section 71.340, that incurs labor costs for
facility relocation due to such maintenance or project. A
county shall be authorized to pay such facility relocation
labor costs as part of the cost of the road project.
2. A county shall notify non-rate-regulated utility
providers that have permitted infrastructure within a
planned or existing public right-of-way within ninety days
after a road project is added to the county project schedule
that may require the provider to relocate its infrastructure
for the road project. The notification provided under this
subsection shall include an estimated project schedule and
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SCS SB 1065 2
timeline, including the anticipated year of construction.
Within ninety days after receipt of the notification, the
non-rate-regulated utility provider shall respond to the
county with an estimated time frame and projected labor cost
for the relocation of the provider's infrastructure. The
response shall include a draft relocation schedule within or
adjacent to the existing or planned public right-of-way.
3. Nothing in this section shall require a county to
reimburse a non-rate-regulated utility provider for the
removal or relocation of facilities placed in the public
right-of-way in violation of state or local permitting
requirements.
4. As used in this section, the term "road project"
means any road maintenance or road construction project.
67.2707. 1. A video service provider shall be subject
to the provisions of sections 67.1830 to [67.1846] 67.1849
and chapter 229 and shall also be subject to the provisions
of section 227.240 applying to cable television companies,
and to all reasonable police power-based regulations of a
political subdivision regarding the placement, screening,
and relocation of facilities, including, but not limited to:
(1) Requirements that the video service provider
provide landscaping to screen the placement of cabinets or
structures from public view consistent with the location
chosen;
(2) Requirements that the video service provider
contact the nearby property owners to communicate what work
will be done and when;
(3) Requiring alternate placement of facilities, or
prescribing the time, method, and manner of such placement,
when it is necessary to protect the public right-of-way or

SCS SB 1065 3
the safety of the public, notwithstanding the provisions of
sections 67.1830 to [67.1846] 67.1849;
(4) Requirements that cabinets be removed or relocated
[at the expense of the video service provider] under the
provisions of section 67.1849 or 71.340, as applicable, when
necessary to accommodate construction, improvement, or
maintenance of streets [or], other public works, [excluding
minor] or beautification projects.
2. A political subdivision may not impose the
following regulations on video service providers:
(1) Requirements that particular business offices or
portions of a video service network be located in the
political subdivision;
(2) Requirements for political subdivision approval of
transfers of ownership or control of the business or assets
of a video service provider's business, except that a
political subdivision may require that such entity maintain
current point-of-contact information and provide notice of a
transfer within a reasonable time; and
(3) Requirements concerning the provisioning of or
quality of customer services, facilities, equipment or goods
in-kind for use by the political subdivision or any other
video service provider or public utility.
71.340. 1. The mayor and city council of any city or
the chairman and board of trustees of any incorporated town
or village shall have the power to annually appropriate and
pay out of the treasury of such city or incorporated town or
village a sum of money, not to exceed ten percent of the
annual general revenue thereof, for the purpose of
constructing, building, repairing, working, grading or
macadamizing any public road, street and highway and any
bridge thereon leading to and from such city or incorporated

SCS SB 1065 4
town or village; and such appropriation shall be made by
ordinance and the money so appropriated shall be applied
under the supervision and direction of the engineers of such
city or incorporated town or village, and of the county
highway engineer of the county in which such city, town or
village is located, or of some competent person selected by
such city, town or village and approved by the county
highway engineer, who shall make a report thereof, in
writing, to the mayor and city council of such city, or to
the chairman and board of trustees of such incorporated town
or village; but this privilege shall not extend to a greater
distance than five miles from the corporate limits of such
city, town or village, and shall not be construed so as to
allow any obstruction to or interference with the free use
of any such public road, street or highway by the public,
except so far as may be necessary while such work is being
done, and further shall not be construed to affect the
liability of such city, town or village, which liability
shall be the same as if such roads, streets and highways
were inside the city limits.
2. Notwithstanding any rule, order, decision, permit,
agreement, or other authorization to the contrary, a city,
incorporated town, or village shall not perform any road
project unless it reimburses any non-rate-regulated utility
provider that incurs labor costs for facility relocation due
to such maintenance or project. A city, incorporated town,
or village shall be authorized to pay such facility
relocation labor costs as part of the cost of the road
project.
3. For the purposes of this section and sections
226.220 and 226.224, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Non-rate-regulated utility provider" shall mean:

SCS SB 1065 5
(a) A telecommunications company as defined in
subdivision (52) of section 386.020 whose telecommunications
services are not subject to rate-of-return regulation by the
public service commission pursuant to subsection 1 of
section 392.240;
(b) A provider of broadband and other internet
protocol-enabled services as defined in subsection 2 of
section 392.611;
(c) A video service provider as defined in subdivision
(17) of subsection 1 of section 67.2677; or
(d) A cable operator as defined in subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of section 67.2677;
(2) "Road project", any road maintenance or road
construction projects.
4. A city, incorporated town, or village shall notify
non-rate-regulated utility providers that have permitted
infrastructure within a planned or existing public right-of-
way within ninety days after a road project is added to the
city, incorporated town, or village project schedule that
may require the provider to relocate its infrastructure for
the road project. The notification provided under this
subsection shall include an estimated project schedule and
timeline, including the anticipated year of construction.
Within ninety days after receipt of the notification, the
non-rate-regulated utility provider shall respond to the
city, incorporated town, or village with an estimated time
frame and projected labor cost for the relocation of the
provider's infrastructure. The response shall include a
draft relocation schedule within or adjacent to the existing
or planned public right-of-way.
5. Nothing in this section shall require a city,
incorporated town, or village to reimburse a non-rate-

SCS SB 1065 6
regulated utility provider for the removal or relocation of
facilities placed in the public right-of-way in violation of
state law or local permitting requirements.
226.220. 1. There is hereby created and set up the
"State Road Fund" which shall receive all moneys and credits
from:
(1) The sale of state road bonds;
(2) The United States government and intended for
highway purposes;
(3) The state road bond and interest sinking fund as
provided in section 226.210; and
(4) Any other source if they are held for expenditure
by or under the department of transportation or the state
highways and transportation commission and if they are not
required by section 226.200 to be transferred to the state
highway department fund.
2. The costs and expenses withdrawn from the state
treasury:
(1) For locating, relocating, establishing, acquiring,
reimbursing for, constructing, improving and maintaining
state highways in the systems specified in Article IV,
Section 30(b), of the Constitution;
(2) For reimbursing non-rate-regulated utility
providers, as defined in subsection 3 of section 71.340, for
any labor costs incurred in facility relocation that is
required due to road maintenance or construction;
(3) For acquiring materials, equipment and buildings;
and
[(3)] (4) For other purposes and contingencies
relating and appertaining to the construction and
maintenance of said highways shall be paid from the state
road fund upon warrants drawn by the state auditor, based

SCS SB 1065 7
upon bills of particulars and vouchers preapproved and
certified for payment by the commissioner of administration
and by the state highways and transportation commission
acting through such of their employees as may be designated
by them.
3. No payments or transfers shall ever be made from
the state road fund except for an expenditure made:
(1) Under the supervision and direction of the state
highways and transportation commission; and
(2) For a purpose set out in Subparagraph (1), (2),
(3), (4), or (5) of Section 30(b), Article IV, of the
Constitution.
226.224. 1. Notwithstanding any rule, order,
decision, permit, agreement, or other authorization to the
contrary, the department shall reimburse non-rate-regulated
utility providers, as defined in subsection 3 of section
71.340, for any labor costs incurred in facility relocation
that is required due to road maintenance, construction, or
other right-of-way work activity.
2. The department shall notify non-rate-regulated
utility providers that have permitted infrastructure within
a planned or existing public right-of-way within ninety days
after a road project is added to the department project
schedule that may require the provider to relocate its
infrastructure for the road project. The notification
provided under this subsection shall include an estimated
project schedule and timeline, including the anticipated
year of construction. Within ninety days after receipt of
the notification, the non-rate-regulated utility provider
shall respond to the department with an estimated time frame
and projected labor cost for the relocation of the
provider's infrastructure. The response shall include a

SCS SB 1065 8
draft relocation schedule within or adjacent to the existing
or planned public right-of-way.
3. Nothing in this section shall require the
department to reimburse a non-rate-regulated utility
provider for the removal or relocation of facilities placed
in the public right-of-way in violation of state law or
local permitting requirements.
227.558. 1. If the owner of a utility facility fails
to provide the responses or corrections to project plans
required by sections 227.553 to 227.556, the commission may
recover from the owner damages in the amount of up to one
hundred dollars per day for each day the required act is not
completed.
2. If the owner fails to provide a relocation plan or
fails to timely relocate utility facilities in accordance
with the relocation plan as required by section 227.555, the
commission may recover from the owner damages in the amount
of up to one thousand dollars per day for each day the
required act is not completed.
3. The damages authorized by subsections 1 and 2 of
this section may be recovered through actions brought by the
chief counsel to the commission, or may be referred to the
attorney general for appropriate action. An action to
collect the damages authorized by this section shall be
brought in a court of appropriate jurisdiction. All damages
collected under this section shall be deposited in the state
road fund.
4. No damages or fines of any kind shall be assessed
for delays that result, in whole or in part, directly or
indirectly, from any of the following:
(1) Customer delays;
(2) Labor strikes or shortages;

SCS SB 1065 9
(3) Terrorist attacks, riots, civil unrest, or
criminal sabotage;
(4) Acts of God, or extreme weather events;
(5) Delays caused by staffing shortages in the
geographic area near the commission's construction project
due to the owner's need to reassign an unusual number of
workers to any other area to respond to an act of God or
extreme weather event;
(6) The failure of another owner to sufficiently
complete its required relocation of utility facilities that
interfere with an owner's relocation plan;
(7) The failure of another owner or delay by another
owner in submitting relocation plans that interfere with an
owner's relocation plan;
(8) Delays by the commission in acquiring necessary
right-of-way or necessary easements;
(9) Delays caused by facility damages or cable cuts
caused by the commission's contractor, other owners, or
third parties;
(10) Unusual material shortages; and
(11) Any other event or action beyond the reasonable
control of the owner.
The occurrence of any of the unusual events listed in this
section shall constitute an affirmative defense to the
assessment of damages under the provisions of this section.
5. Except as provided in section 226.224, the removal
and relocation of utility facilities as a result of
construction projects required by the commission shall be
made at the expense of the owners unless otherwise provided
by the commission. If the owner fails to relocate the
utility facilities in accordance with the relocation plan as

SCS SB 1065 10
required by section 227.555, the utility facilities may be
removed and relocated by the state highways and
transportation commission, or under its direction, and the
cost of relocating the utility facilities shall be
[collected from such owner] the responsibility of the
commission, as required by section 226.224, or the owner.
If the state highways and transportation commission or its
designee removes and relocates the utility facilities, the
utility owner shall not be liable to any party for any
damages caused by the commission's or the commission's
designee's removal and relocation of such facilities.
227.559. Any home rule city having a population of
sixty thousand inhabitants or greater or any charter county
of the first classification may adopt ordinances, policies,
resolutions, or regulations consistent with sections
67.1849, 71.340, and 227.551 to 227.559 regarding the
relocation of utility facilities located within the right-of-
way of streets, highways, or roads under their respective
jurisdiction, which are not state highways. Any ordinance,
policy, resolution, or regulation adopted under the
authority of this section shall not infringe upon, negate or
otherwise abrogate an owner's right to construct, own,
operate, and maintain utility facilities within the right-of-
ways of such political subdivision that the owner otherwise
enjoyed prior to the adoption of such ordinance, policy,
resolution, or regulation.
229.360. Unless otherwise required by law, including
section 67.1849, it shall be the duty of any person, firm or
corporation owning, leasing, or operating any such conduits,
poles, pole lines, wires, mains, pipes, conductors, sewers,
drains, tramways or other objects, after service of the
notice required in section 229.350 to furnish such competent

SCS SB 1065 11
workmen and crews as may be necessary to effect such
removal, change or alteration, and to pay all actual
expenses which are incurred by any person, firm, corporation
or political subdivision in so doing. In making such
necessary removal, change or alteration, no other person,
firm, corporation or political subdivision shall interfere
with or make any such change, removal or alteration until
the owner, lessee or operators of such object shall have
been notified as provided in section 229.350, and shall have
failed or refused to do so within a reasonable time, and in
the event of such failure or refusal such work shall be done
only by competent and experienced workmen at the cost and
expense, however, of the owner, lessee or operators of such
object.
✓